Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-179.02
College of Medicine; physicians' assistant or associate, defined.

For purposes of sections 85-179.01 to 85-179.03, unless the context otherwise requires, physicians' assistant or physicians' associate shall mean a person who is qualified by training and experience to act as an assistant to, or an associate of, a licensed physician.

Laws 1972, LB 985, § 2.